fr: Dureté du procédé de queue: Extra dur; Extra tendre; Dur; Moyen; Moyen dur; Moyen tendre; Tendre; Autre
zh-TW: 球桿皮頭硬度: 特硬; 特軟; 硬; 中; 中硬; 中軟; 軟; 其他
sv: Hårdhet på köspets: Extra hård; Extra mjuk; Hård; Medium; Medium-hård; Medium-mjuk; Mjuk; Övrigt
tr: İsteka ucunun sertliği: Ekstra sert; Ekstra yumuşak; Sert; Orta; Orta sert; Orta yumuşak; Yumuşak; Diğer
hr-HR: Tvrdoća vrha štapa: Izuzetno tvrdo; Izuzetno mekano; Tvrdo; Srednje; Srednje tvrdo; Srednje mekano; Mekano; Ostalo
nb: Hardhet på køspissen: Ekstra hard; Ekstra myk; Hard; Middels; Middels hard; Middels myk; Myk; Annet
ko: 큐팁 경도: 엑스트라 하드; 엑스트라 소프트; 하드; 미디엄; 미디엄 하드; 미디엄 소프트; 소프트; 기타
bg-BG: Твърдост на върха на щеката: Много твърд; Много мек; Твърд; Среден; Средно твърд; Средно мек; Мек; Други
sl-SI: Trdota konice biljardne palice: Zelo trdo; Zelo mehko; Trdo; Srednje; Srednje trdo; Srednje mehko; Mehko; Drugo
pt-PT: dureza da ponta do taco: Extra dura; Extra macia; Dura; Média; Média-dura; Média-macia; Macia; Outra
ja: キューチップの硬度: エクストラハード; エクストラソフト; ハード; ミディアム; ミディアムハード; ミディアムソフト; ソフト; その他
es: Dureza de la punta del taco: Extradura; Extrablanda; Dura; Media; Media dura; Media blanda; Blanda; Otro
de: Härte der Queuespitze: Extra hart; Extra weich; Hart; Mittel; Mittelhart; Mittelweich; Weich; Sonstige
ru: Жесткость наклейки кия: Очень жесткая; Очень мягкая; Жесткая; Средняя; Средне-жесткая; Средне-мягкая; Мягкая; Другое
sk-SK: Tvrdosť hrotu tága: Extra tvrdá; Extra mäkká; Tvrdá; Stredná; Stredne tvrdá; Stredne mäkká; Mäkká; Iné
fi: Biljardikepin kärjen kovuus: Erittäin kova; Erittäin pehmeä; Kova; Keskikova; Keskikova–kova; Keskikova–pehmeä; Pehmeä; Muu
el: Σκληρότητα άκρου στέκας: Πολύ σκληρή; Πολύ μαλακή; Σκληρή; Μεσαία; Ημίσκληρη; Ημιμαλακή; Μαλακή; Άλλο
zh-CN: 球杆杆头硬度: 极硬; 极软; 硬; 中; 中硬; 中软; 软; 其他
hu: Dákóhegy keménysége: Extra kemény; Extra puha; Kemény; Közepes; Közepesen kemény; Közepesen puha; Puha; Egyéb
pt-BR: Dureza da ponta do taco: Extra duro; Extra macio; Duro; Médio; Médio duro; Médio macio; Macio; Outro
da: Køspidsens hårdhed: Ekstra hård; Ekstra blød; Hård; Medium; Mellemhård; Mellemblød; Blød; Andet
th: ความแข็งของหัวคิว: แข็งพิเศษ; นุ่มพิเศษ; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; แข็งปานกลาง; นุ่มปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
it: Durezza della punta della stecca: Extra dura; Extra morbida; Dura; Media; Medio-dura; Medio-morbida; Morbida; Altro
nl: Keutip hardheid: Extra hard; Extra zacht; Hard; Medium; Medium hard; Medium zacht; Zacht; Overig
cs: Tvrdost kůže na tága: Extra tvrdá; Extra měkká; Tvrdá; Střední; Středně tvrdá; Středně měkká; Měkká; Ostatní
ro-RO: Duritatea vârfului tacului: Foarte tare; Foarte moale; Tare; Mediu; Mediu-tare; Mediu-moale; Moale; Altele
en: Cue tip hardness: Extra hard; Extra soft; Hard; Medium; Medium hard; Medium soft; Soft; Other
lt-LT: Lazdos antgalio kietumas: Ypač kietas; Ypač minkštas; Kietas; Vidutinis; Vidutiniškai kietas; Vidutiniškai minkštas; Minkštas; Kita
pl: Twardość końcówki kija: Bardzo twarda; Bardzo miękka; Twarda; Średnia; Średnio twarda; Średnio miękka; Miękka; Inne
vi: Độ cứng đầu cơ bi-a: Rất cứng; Rất mềm; Cứng; Trung bình; Cứng vừa; Mềm vừa; Mềm; Khác